District of Columbia statutes.
3-1104

Restriction on job training program combined with sprinkler installation program.

Any job training programs chosen to be combined with a sprinkler installation program shall perform their job training activities within the District of Columbia.

History

Mar. 16, 1985, D.C. Law 5-183, § 5, 32 DCR 841

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 2-3104.